Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-2108
Wiring or installing; license required; exceptions; lending license prohibited.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section or in section 81-2110, 81-2112, or 81-2144, no person shall, for another, wire for or install electrical wiring, apparatus, or equipment unless he or she is licensed by the board as a Class B electrical contractor, an electrical contractor, a Class A master electrician, a Class B master electrician, or a fire alarm installer.

(2) Except as provided in section 81-2106, 81-2110, 81-2112, or 81-2144, no person shall wire for or install electrical wiring, apparatus, or equipment or supervise an apprentice electrician unless such person is licensed as a Class B journeyman electrician, a journeyman electrician, a residential journeyman electrician, or a fire alarm installer and is employed by a Class B electrical contractor, an electrical contractor, a Class A master electrician, a Class B master electrician, or a fire alarm installer.

For purposes of this section, the holder of a fire alarm installer license shall only supervise those apprentices engaged in the installation of fire alarm equipment and apparatus operating at fifty volts or less.

(3) No person licensed under the State Electrical Act may lend his or her license to any person or knowingly permit the use of such license by another.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 9;

Laws 1978, LB 833, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 81-579;

Laws 1982, LB 605, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 126, § 7;

Laws 2004, LB 914, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB65, § 3.